Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 50

Tennessee Film, Entertainment and Music Commission Act of 1987

4-3-5001. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Film, Entertainment and Music Commission Act of 1987.”

Acts 1987, ch. 288 § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 50, §§4-3-5001 —4-3-5004 (Acts 1980, ch. 848, §§ 1, 3-5; 1981, ch. 294, §§ 1-3), concerning the office of film and television production (formerly the Tennessee film, tape, and music commission) and the advisory commission thereto, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 288, § 1; Acts 1987, ch. 356, § 2(b); and Acts 1987, ch. 358, § 2(b).

4-3-5002. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Entertainment properties” means motion pictures, television programs, computer-generated imagery, interactive digital media, stand-alone post-production scoring and editing, sound recordings, and other audio, video, or audiovisual programs produced for distribution to the public;

“Local government” means any county, municipality, city or other political subdivision of this state;

“Production activities” mean activities related to the production of entertainment properties; and

“Production facilities” mean streets, roads, highways, buildings, real or personal property or personal services.

Acts 1987, ch. 288, § 1; 2018, ch. 919, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 50, §§4-3-5001 -4-3-5004 (Acts 1980, ch. 848, §§ 1, 3-5; 1981, ch. 294, §§ 1-3), concerning the office of film and television production (formerly the Tennessee film, tape, and music commission) and the advisory commission thereto, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 288, § 1; Acts 1987, ch. 356, § 2(b); and Acts 1987, ch. 358, § 2(b).

4-3-5003. Creation of commission — Executive director.

There is created within the office of the governor, the Tennessee film, entertainment and music commission.

The commission shall be administered by an executive director who shall be appointed by the governor, whose compensation shall be established by the governor and who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

For administrative purposes only, the commission shall be attached to the department of economic and community development.

To effectuate the purposes of this part, the executive director may:

Request from any branch, department, division, board, bureau, commission or other agency of the state or that receives state funds, and the same shall provide, such information as will enable the executive director to best serve the commission and perform the duties required by this part;

Enter into agreements with any local government authorizing the commission to grant permission, in accordance with rules or regulations promulgated by the commission, for use of any production facilities within the control or jurisdiction of such local government for or in connection with production activities;

Coordinate the use of production facilities within the control of any branch, department, bureau, commission or other agency of this state for or in connection with production activities and, after receipt of authorization from the appropriate official or officials, grant permission for the use of such facilities;

Issue permits to producers of entertainment properties in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the commission; and

Employ all necessary and appropriate personnel to carry out this part. Such personnel shall serve at the pleasure of the executive director.

Acts 1987, ch. 288, § 1; 1991, ch. 357, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 50, §§4-3-5001 -4-3-5004 (Acts 1980, ch. 848, §§ 1, 3-5; 1981, ch. 294, §§ 1-3), concerning the office of film and television production (formerly the Tennessee film, tape, and music commission) and the advisory commission thereto, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 288, § 1; Acts 1987, ch. 356, § 2(b); and Acts 1987, ch. 358, § 2(b).

The Tennessee film, entertainment and music commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

4-3-5004. Members — Advisory council.

The Tennessee film, entertainment and music commission shall be composed of nine (9) Tennessee citizens who have experience in and knowledge of the film, television or music industries. The commission shall be appointed by the governor to assist and counsel the governor on the subject for which it was created. One (1) member shall be appointed from each of the film, television and music segments of the industry. The membership of the commission shall also reflect the racial makeup of the state.

The members of the commission shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years. In making the initial appointments, four (4) members shall be appointed for four-year terms and five (5) members shall be appointed for two-year terms. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for the full term. At least one (1) member of the commission shall reside in each grand division. Each member shall serve until the member's successor is appointed, and if a vacancy occurs on the commission, it shall be filled by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term. The governor shall designate one (1) member of the commission to serve as chair for a one-year term. The chair may be reappointed to serve for one (1) additional term. No member may serve as chair for more than two (2) consecutive terms.

The commission shall meet at least quarterly but may meet as often as the duties of such commission require.

The commission members shall receive no compensation for their services on the commission but shall receive reimbursement for expenses incurred in attending meetings of the commission and for travel incident thereto, in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The governor shall appoint a film, entertainment and music advisory council to assist and advise the commission in the performance of its duties. Such council shall be appointed by the governor and the number of its members shall be determined by the governor. Each advisory council member shall be appointed for a two-year term and the duties of the council shall be established by the commission. The governor shall designate one (1) member of the advisory council to serve as chair for a one-year term. The chair may be reappointed to serve for one (1) additional term. No member may serve as chair more than two (2) consecutive terms.

Acts 1987, ch. 288, §§ 1, 3; 1989, ch. 162, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 50, §§4-3-5001 -4-3-5004 (Acts 1980, ch. 848, §§ 1, 3-5; 1981, ch. 294, §§ 1-3), concerning the office of film and television production (formerly the Tennessee film, tape, and music commission) and the advisory commission thereto, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 288, § 1; Acts 1987, ch. 356, § 2(b); and Acts 1987, ch. 358, § 2(b).

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

4-3-5005. Purpose of commission — Rules and regulations.

The purposes of the Tennessee film, entertainment and music commission are to:

Attract and bring to this state the production activities of film, television, record and other producers of entertainment properties;

Develop increased production activities by those producers of entertainment properties already located in this state; and

Coordinate the needs of the producers of entertainment properties with the needs of the citizens of this state and of the various departments of state and local governments.

To accomplish the purposes of the film, entertainment and music commission, it has the authority to promulgate and enforce all necessary rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

Acts 1987, ch. 288, § 1; 1991, ch. 357, § 6.

4-3-5006. Use and disclosure of information.

No member of the commission or the council shall use information gained as such member for personal gain or shall reveal such information to any person except in connection with commission or council activities.

Acts 1987, ch. 288, § 2.